Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Short Title and Reservation of Power

48-11-101. Short title.

Chapters 11-27 of this title shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Business Corporation Act.”

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 1.01.

Cross-References. Acts of incorporation left unrepealed, § 1-2-105.

Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Cemetery companies, title 46, ch. 2.

Chancery jurisdiction of controversies, § 16-11-105.

Corporations created by general law, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 8.

Nonprofit corporations, general provisions, title 48, ch. 51.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-104, 5-203.

Law Reviews.

Aligning Law and Forum: The Home Court Advantage, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (2013).

The Supercharged IPO, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 307 (2014).

Dual Identities and Dueling Obligations: Preserving Independence in Corporate Representation, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 179 (2001).

Punitive Damages and Business Organizations: A Pathetic Fallacy, 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 971 (2000).

The Debt-Equity Distinction in a Second-Best World, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 1055 (2000).

Why a Board? Group Decisionmaking in Corporate Governance, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

Attorney General Opinions. Provision of physical therapy services by a non-professional corporation. OAG 94-131, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 144 (11/8/94).

48-11-102. Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The general assembly has the power to amend or repeal all or part of chapters 11-27 of this title at any time, and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to chapters 11-27 of this title shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 1.02.

Cross-References. General assembly's power to amend or repeal laws regarding domestic and foreign limited liability corporations, § 48-201-102.

General assembly's power to amend or repeal laws regarding domestic and foreign nonprofit corporations, § 48-51-102.

General assembly's power to amend or repeal laws regarding domestic and foreign professional corporations, § 48-101-634.

General assembly's power to amend or repeal laws regarding domestic and foreign professional limited liability corporations, § 48-248-606.

48-11-103. Eminent domain.

Chapters 11-27 of this title do not repeal or affect the right or power of eminent domain under other existing laws, and any corporation which shall have the power of eminent domain under existing laws shall have the power to the same extent and in the same manner as if organized under chapters 11-27 of this title, and all statutes of this state granting the power of eminent domain and making compensation shall remain in force and effect and applicable to the appropriate existing corporations and to the appropriate corporations organized under chapters 11-27 of this title.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 1.03.

Cross-References. Nonprofit corporations — Eminent domain, § 48-51-103.

48-11-104. Applicability.

Chapters 11-27 of this title shall apply to every corporation for profit now existing or hereafter formed, and to the outstanding and future securities thereof; provided, that, if there are other specific statutory provisions which govern the formation of, impose restrictions or requirements on, confer special powers, privileges or authorities on, or fix special procedures or methods for, special categories of corporations, then to the extent such provisions are inconsistent with or different from chapters 11-27 of this title, such provisions shall prevail.

Acts 1987, ch. 273, § 2.